Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-3] International application. A
court of the State of Hawaii may treat a foreign country as if it were a state
for the purpose of applying this part and parts II, III, and IV. [L 2012, c
236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next